Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 33 The Rhode Island Military Family Relief Act

30-33-1.
Short title.

This act may be cited as “The Family Military Leave Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 65, § 1.

30-33-2.
Definitions.

The following words or phrases, as used in this chapter, mean the following:

“Employee” means any person who may be permitted, required, or directed by an employer in consideration of direct or indirect gain or profit to engage in any employment. “Employee” does include an independent contractor. “Employee” includes an employee of a covered employer who has been employed by the same employer for at least twelve (12) months, and has been employed from at least one thousand two hundred fifty (1,250) hours of service during a twelve-month (12) period immediately preceding the commencement of leave.

“Employee benefits” means all benefits, other than salary or wages, provided or made available to employees by an employer and includes group life insurance, health insurance, disability insurance, and pensions, regardless of whether benefits are provided by a policy or practice of an employer.

“Employer” means any person, partnership, corporation, association, other business entities, the state of Rhode Island, Rhode Island municipalities, and other units of local government.

“Family military leave”, means leave requested by an employee who is the spouse or parent of a person called to military service lasting longer than thirty (30) days with the state of Rhode Island or the United States pursuant to the orders of the governor of Rhode Island or the President of the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 65, § 1.

30-33-3.
Family military leave requirements.

Any employer, as defined in §

30-33-2

, that employs between fifteen (15) and fifty (50) employees shall provide up to fifteen (15) days of unpaid family military leave to an employee during the time federal or state orders are in effect, in accordance with the provisions set forth in this section. Family military leave granted under this act may consist of unpaid leave.

Any employer, as defined in §

30-33-2

, that employs more than fifty (50) employees shall provide up to thirty (30) days of unpaid family military leave to an employee during the time federal or state orders are in effect, in accordance with the provisions set forth in this section. Family military leave granted under this act may consist of unpaid leave.

The employee shall give at least fourteen (14) days notice of the intended date upon which family military leave will commence if the leave will consist of five (5) or more consecutive workdays. Where able, the employee shall consult with the employer to schedule the leave to not unduly disrupt the operations of the employer. Employees taking military family leave for less than five (5) consecutive days shall give the employer advance notice as is practicable. The employer may require certification from the proper military authority to verify the employee’s eligibility to take the requested family military leave.

An employee shall not take leave as provided under this act unless he or she has exhausted all accrued vacation leave, personal leave, compensatory leave or time, and any other leave that may be granted to the employee, with the exception of sick leave and disability leave.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 65, § 1.

30-33-4.
Employee benefits protection.

Any employee who exercises the right to family military leave under this act, upon the expiration of their leave, shall be entitled to restoration, by the employer, to the position held by the employee when the leave commenced or to a position with equivalent seniority status, employee benefits, pay, and other terms and conditions of employment. This section does not apply if the employer proves that the employee was not restored as provided in this section because of conditions unrelated to the employee’s exercise of rights under this act.

During any family military leave taken under this act, the employer shall make it possible for employees to continue their benefits at the employee’s expense. The employer and employee may negotiate for the employer to maintain benefits at the employer’s expense for the duration of the leave.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 65, § 1.

30-33-5.
Prohibited actions.

An employer shall not interfere with, restrain, or deny the exercise or the attempt to exercise any right provided under this act.

An employer shall not discharge, fine, suspend, expel, discipline, or in any other manner discriminate against any employee who exercises any right provided under this act.

An employer shall not discharge, fine, suspend, expel, discipline, or in any other manner discriminate against any employee for opposing any practice made unlawful under this act.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 65, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 51.

30-33-6.
Enforcement.

A civil action may be brought to the state court having jurisdiction by any employee to enforce this act. The court may enjoin any act or practice that violates or may violate this act and may order any other equitable relief that is necessary and appropriate to redress the violation or to enforce this act.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 65, § 1.